Massachusetts, session 194th, H2954.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of chapter 32, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by deleting the third sentence of subsection (c1/2) of subsection 8 and inserting
in place thereof the following:- Any system found by the commission to have a funded ratio of
less than fifty percent and an annual rate of return during the previous ten years that is at least
three percentage points less than that of the PRIT Fund rate of return over the same period shall
be declared underperforming by the commission.
SECTION 2. Section 22 of Chapter 32, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by deleting in the first paragraph of subsection (c 1/2) of subsection 8 the words
"shall be in perpetuity" and inserting in the place thereof:- may not be revoked for five years.
of 1